New Jersey, session 221, A523.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   An electric public utility shall develop and establish a plan to disseminate, through any Internet-based social media account and text message alert service voluntarily maintained by the electric public utility, information concerning the location of warming centers, electronic communication device charging stations, and the availability of potable water and ice to the public from the electric public utility during power outages. The information shall include, but not be limited to: (1)   the address of each warming center and the dates and hours of operation; (2)   the address of each electronic communication device charging station and the dates and hours of operation; (3)   the address of each location where potable water and ice will be available to the public; and (4)   the dates and hours potable water and ice will be available to the public. b.    The Office of Emergency Management, the Division of State Police, and any other appropriate State, county, or municipal entity may, on their respective Internet-based social media accounts or websites, disseminate information made available by electric public utilities pursuant to subsection a. of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.